Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 27. Regulation of Elections.

§ 23-15-871.
General prohibitions with respect to employers, employees, and public officials.

No corporation or any officer or employee thereof, or any member of a firm, or trustee or any member of any association, or any other employer, may direct or coerce, directly or indirectly, any employee to vote or not to vote for any particular person or group of persons in any election, or to discharge or to threaten to discharge any such employee, or to increase or decrease the salary or wages of an employee, or otherwise promote or demote the employee, because of his or her vote or failure to vote for any particular candidate or group of candidates.

No employer, or employee having the authority to employ or discharge other employees, may make any statement public or private, or give out or circulate any report or statement, calculated to intimidate or coerce or otherwise influence any vote of an employee, and when any such statement has been circulated, it shall be the duty of the employer to publicly repudiate it or the employer shall be deemed by way of ratification to have made it himself or herself.

No employee may be requested, directed or permitted to canvass for or against any candidate or render any other services for or against any candidate or group of candidates, during any of the hours within which the salary of the employee as an employee is being paid or agreed to be paid. No employee may be allowed any vacation or leave of absence at the expense of the employer to render any service or services for or against any candidate or group of candidates, or to take any active part in any election campaign whatsoever, except the necessary time to cast his or her vote.

The prohibitions of this section shall apply to all state, state district, county and county district officers, and to any board or commission and the members thereof by whatever name designated and whether elective or appointive, and to each one of those employed by them or any of them.

No state, state district, county or county district officer, or any employee who directly or indirectly has the control, or who asserts that he or she has such power, over the expenditure of any public funds in this state shall state, suggest or intimate, publicly or privately, or in any manner or form, that any such expenditure shall depend upon or be influenced by the vote of any person, group of persons, or community or group of communities, whether for or against any candidate or group of candidates at any election.

This section and every part of it shall apply also to all federal officers, agents, employees, boards and commissions as to any interference contrary to the provisions of this chapter, in the elections of this state.

Any violation of this section shall be a violation of Section 97-13-37 and shall be referred to a district attorney for prosecution.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-29 [Codes, 1942, § 3172; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 263; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 180, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-873.
Prohibitions against promises of public positions or employment, public contracts, or public expenditures; exceptions; violation of section constitutes violation of Section 97-13-37.

No person, whether an officer or not, shall, in order to promote his or her own candidacy, or that of any other person, to be a candidate for public office in this state, directly or indirectly, himself, or herself or through another person, promise to appoint, or promise to secure or assist in securing the appointment, nomination or election of another person to any public position or employment, or to secure or assist in securing any public contract or the employment of any person under any public contractor, or to secure or assist in securing the expenditure of any public funds in the personal behalf of any particular person or group of persons, except that the candidate may publicly announce what is his or her choice or purpose in relation to an election in which he or she may be called on to take part if elected.

It shall be unlawful for any person to directly or indirectly solicit or receive any promise by this section prohibited, but this does not apply to any person when it comes to their office force.

Any violation of this section shall constitute a violation of Section 97-13-37 and shall be referred to the district attorney for prosecution.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-31 [Codes, 1942, § 3173; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 264; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 144, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-874.
Prohibition against use of court personnel in judicial campaigns; violations.

A candidate for judicial office shall not use court administrators, deputy court administrators, court reporters, deputy court reporters, judges’ secretaries or law clerks as workers in his or her campaign activities. Violations of this section shall be referred to the Commission on Judicial Performance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 301, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 145, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-875.
Prohibitions against charges with respect to integrity of candidate.

No person, including a candidate, shall publicly or privately make, in a campaign then in progress, any charge or charges reflecting upon the honesty, integrity or moral character of any candidate, so far as his or her private life is concerned, unless the charge be in fact true and actually capable of proof; and any person who makes any such charge shall have the burden of proof to show the truth thereof when called to account therefor under any affidavit or indictment against him or her for a violation of this section. Any language deliberately uttered or published which, when fairly and reasonably construed and as commonly understood, would clearly and unmistakably imply any such charge, shall be deemed and held to be the equivalent of a direct charge.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-33 [Codes, 1942, § 3174; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 265; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 146, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-877.
Prohibitions against newspaper editorials and stories with respect to integrity of candidate; newspaper’s obligation to print reply; liability for damages.

If during any election campaign in Mississippi any newspaper either domiciled in the state, or outside of the state circulating inside the State of Mississippi, shall print any editorial or news story reflecting upon the honesty or integrity or moral character of any candidate in such campaign or on the honesty and integrity or moral character of any candidate who was elected or defeated in such campaign, such newspaper shall, on the written or telegraphic request of such candidate or his agents, print in such newspaper not later than the second issue of such newspaper following the receipt of such request, a statement by the candidate or his duly accredited representative giving the candidate’s reply. Such statement shall be printed in the exact language which the candidate or his representative presents and shall be printed as near as is practical on the same page, in the same position, and in the same size type and headlines as the original editorial or news story reflecting on the candidate had been printed.

This section shall be construed to include those news stories wherein the newspaper quotes from a candidate or individual statements attacking the honesty or integrity or moral character of a candidate or ex-candidate.

If such newspaper fails or refuses to publish such answer when requested, the owner of such newspaper shall be liable to a suit for damages by the candidate claiming to be injured by such publication. In event of a verdict in favor of the plaintiff, the measure of damages shall be the injury suffered or a penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), whichever is the larger amount. In all cases, the truth of the charge may be offered as defense to the suit. But nothing herein contained shall be construed to abolish any existing legal rights of action in such cases.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-35 [Codes, 1942, § 3175; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 266, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-879.
Exemption of newspapers and other publications from requirements as to subscription of printed matter.

Section 23-15-897 shall not apply to editorials, original or copies, in any newspaper or other publication regularly published and issued to bona fide paid subscribers, and not published and issued solely or principally for political purposes, or to news matter prepared and written by the regularly employed staff of the paper, or to the printing in said paper of any letter together with the signature thereto, provided that any of the matter so printed and published is not prohibited by the provisions of Section 23-15-875 or 23-15-877, or by some other prohibition of law.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-39 [Codes, 1942, § 177; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 267, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-881.
Prohibitions against excessive expenditures or hiring of workers for state highways or public roads; maintenance of records.

It shall be unlawful for the Mississippi Transportation Commission or any member of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, or the board of supervisors of any county or any member of the board of supervisors of such county, to employ, during the months of May, June, July and August of any year in which a general primary election is held for the nomination and election of members of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and members of the boards of supervisors, a greater number of persons to work and maintain the state highways, in any highway district, or the public roads, in any supervisors district of the county, as the case may be, than the average number of persons employed for similar purposes in such highway district or supervisors district, as the case may be, during the months of May, June, July and August of the three (3) years immediately preceding the year in which such general primary election is held. It shall be unlawful for the Mississippi Transportation Commission, or the board of supervisors of any county, to expend out of the state highway funds, or the road funds of the county or any supervisors district thereof, as the case may be, in the payment of wages or other compensation for labor performed in working and maintaining the highways of any highway district, or the public roads of any supervisors district of the county, as the case may be, during the months of May, June, July and August of such election year, a total amount in excess of the average total amount expended for such labor, in such highway district or supervisors district, as the case may be, during the corresponding four-month period of the three (3) years immediately preceding.

It shall be the duty of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the board of supervisors of each county, respectively, to keep sufficient records of the numbers of employees and expenditures made for labor on the state highways of each highway district, and the public roads of each supervisors district, for the months of May, June, July and August of each year, to show the number of persons employed for such work in each highway district and each supervisors district, as the case may be, during said four-month period, and the total amount expended in the payment of salaries and other compensation to such employees, so that it may be ascertained, from an examination of such records, whether or not the provisions of this chapter have been violated.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-1-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3133-01; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 8; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 268; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 147, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-883.
Exceptions to prohibitions with respect to state highway or public road expenditures or employment.

The restriction imposed upon the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the boards of supervisors of the several counties in the employment of labor to work and maintain the state highways and the public roads of the several supervisors’ districts of the county, as provided in Section 23-15-881, shall not apply to road contractors or bridge contractors engaged in the construction or maintenance of state highways or county roads under contracts awarded by the Mississippi Transportation Commission, or the board of supervisors, as the case may be, where such contracts shall have been awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, after legal advertisement, as provided by law; nor shall the restriction imposed in Section 23-15-881 apply to the labor employed by such road contractors or bridge contractors in carrying out such contracts. Nor shall the provisions of this chapter apply to the employment by the Mississippi Transportation Commission, or the board of supervisors, as the case may be, of extra labor employed to make repairs upon the state highways or highway bridges, or upon the county roads or bridges, in cases where such state highways or highway bridges, or such county roads or bridges, have been damaged or destroyed by severe storms, floods or other unforeseen disasters.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3134 [Laws, 1940, ch. 156; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 269; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 181, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-885.
Prohibitions against excessive expenditures or hiring of workers for streets of municipalities.

The restrictions imposed in Sections 23-15-881 and 23-15-883 shall likewise apply to the mayor and board of aldermen, or other governing authority, of each municipality, in the employment of labor for working and maintaining the streets of the municipality during the four-month period next preceding the date of holding the general primary election in such municipality for the election of municipal officers.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3135 [Laws, 1940, ch 156; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 270, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-887.
Penalties for violation of chapter by member of Mississippi Transportation Commission, member of board of supervisors, or mayor or member of board of aldermen or other governing authority of municipality.

If any member of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, and any member of the board of supervisors, or the mayor or any member of the board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality, shall violate the provisions of this article, he or she shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3136 [Laws, 1940, ch 156; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 271; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 8; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 182, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-889.
Prohibitions against buying or selling vote or offering to do so; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or offer to sell his or her vote and it shall be likewise unlawful for any person to offer money or anything of substantial value to anyone for his vote. Anyone violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3137 [Codes, 1906, § 3719; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6411; 1930, § 5890; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 272; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 183, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-891.
Prohibition against provision of free services or services at reduced rates by common carriers, Internet service providers, or telephone companies; requirement of sworn statement.

No common carrier, Internet service provider or telephone company shall give to any candidate, or to any member of any political committee, or to any person to be used to aid or promote the success or defeat of any candidate for election for any public office, free transportation or Internet service or telephone service, as the case may be, or any reduction thereof that is not made alike to all other persons. All persons required by the provisions of this chapter to make and file statements shall make oath that they have not received or made use of, directly or indirectly, in connection with any candidacy for nomination to any public office, free transportation or Internet or telephone service.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3138 [Codes, 1906, § 3727; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6421; 1930, § 5891; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 273; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 148, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-893.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 202, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-893. [Derived from 1942 Code § 3132 [Codes, 1906, § 3720; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6412; 1930, § 5889; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch 506]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 274; Laws, 1989, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after April 14, 1989 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).]

§ 23-15-895.
Prohibition against distribution of campaign material within 150 feet of polling place; prohibition against appearance of certain persons at polling place while armed, uniformed, or displaying badge or credentials; enforcement.

No candidate for an elective office, or any representative of such candidate, and no proponent or opponent of any constitutional amendment, local issue or other measure printed on the ballot may post or distribute cards, posters or other campaign literature within one hundred fifty (150) feet of any entrance of the building wherein any election is being held. No candidate or a representative named by him or her in writing may appear at any polling place while armed or uniformed, or display any badge or credentials except as may be issued by the manager of the polling place. As used in this section, the term “local issue” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 23-15-375. This section shall be enforced by election officials and law enforcement officials.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-17 [Codes, 1942, § 3166; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1979, ch. 487 § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 275; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 149, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-897.
Certain information to be included in campaign materials; compliance with section for campaign materials published on electronic platform.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings as defined in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Campaign materials” include any materials designed to influence voters for or against any candidate, party or measure to be voted on at any election, or containing information about any candidate, party or measure paid for by a candidate, political committee, or independent expenditure which requires disclosure under campaign finance laws.

“Publish” means the act or instance of making campaign material available to the public, or to a list of subscribers, by mail, telephone, electronic communications platforms, Internet, software applications, printed materials or any other means of distribution.

“Printed material” shall include, but not be limited to, any notice, placard, bill, poster, dodger, pamphlet, advertisement, sign or any other form of printed publication, except notices, posters and the like, which simply announce a speaking date and invite attendance thereon.

No candidate, political committee or other person shall publish, or knowingly cause to be published, any campaign materials unless it contains the following information:

The name of the candidate along with a statement that the message is approved by the candidate; or

If the message has not been approved by a specific candidate, the name of the person, political committee or organization paying for the publication of the message; or

If the message has not been approved by the candidate and no person, political committee or organization is identified as having paid for the publication, the entity producing the campaign materials must be identified.

Publication of campaign materials through an electronic platform shall be deemed to comply with the requirements of this section if the home page of the candidate or political committee provides the information required by subsection (2), and each electronic publication provides a link to that home page.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-37 [Codes, 1942, §§ 3176, 3178; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 276; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 150, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-899.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 203, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-899. [Derived from 1942 Code § 3141 [Codes, 1906, § 3728; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6422; 1930, § 5894; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 277; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 9, eff from and after July 24, 1987 (the date on which the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).]

§ 23-15-901.
Electors’ privilege from arrest.

Electors shall in all cases other than those of treason, felony or breach of the peace be privileged from arrest during their attendance on elections and going to and returning from the same.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-165 [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 18; 1871, § 368; 1880, § 144; 1892, § 3675; 1906, § 4182; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6816; 1930, § 6248; 1942, § 3277; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 278, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-903.
Procedure for filing complaint of violation of election law.

In addition to any other procedure provided by law, any person who has reason to believe that any election law has been violated may file a written complaint with the election commissioners of the county in which the alleged violation occurred. If the election commissioners determine the allegations in the complaint, if true, would be a violation of this chapter or Section 97-13-1, et seq., the election commissioners shall refer the complaint to the district attorney for prosecution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 528, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 151, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-905.
Qualifying as candidate for more than one office prohibited under certain circumstances.

No person may qualify as a candidate for more than one (1) office if the election for those offices occurs on the same day. If a person takes the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office, the appropriate executive committee or election commissioner shall determine the last office for which the person qualified and the person shall be considered to be qualified as a candidate for that office only and the person shall be notified of this determination. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to elections for municipal office.

No person may qualify as a candidate for more than one (1) municipal office if the election for those offices occurs on the same day. If a person takes the steps necessary to qualify for more than one (1) office, the appropriate executive committee or election commissioner shall determine the last office for which the person qualified and the person shall be considered to be qualified as a candidate for that office only and the person shall be notified of this determination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 604, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 152, eff from and after July 1, 2017.